numerals.lexd
PATTERNS
Numeral[one] [>:>] (ClassMarker | (([<m>:л] | [<f>:л] | [<n>:л]) [<coll>:ла]))
Numeral[one] [>:>] Declension
Numeral[-one] [>:>] [<card>:да] ([>:>] [<coll>:ла])? ([>:>] Declension)?
(Numeral[ten] | Numeral[twenty]) [>:>] [<plus>:лъи]
Tens ((([>:>] [<coll>:ла])? ([>:>] Declension)?) | ([>:>] [<plus>:лъи]))
(Hundreds | Thousands) [>:>] (([<card>:да] ([>:>] [<coll>:ла])? ([>:>] Declension)?) | [<plus>:лъи])
Distributive
([це<NUM>:це̄] | [кIе<NUM>:кIе̄]) [>:>] [<ord>:лъи] ([>:>] (([<and>:ла] ([>:>] [<attr>:ссу])?) | ([<attr>:ссу] ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?)))? ([>:>] Declension)?
(Numeral[-one,-two] | Tens | Hundreds | Thousands) [>:>] [<ord>:лъи] ([>:>] (([<and>:ла] ([>:>] [<attr>:ссу])?) | ([<attr>:ссу] ([>:>] [<and>:ла])?)))? ([>:>] Declension)?
Multiplicative [>:>] [<mult>:цIи] [>:>] [<card>:да]

PATTERN Tens
Numeral[-one,-two,-ten,-twenty] [>:>] [гьацIа<NUM>:цIали]

PATTERN Hundreds
(Numeral[-one,-two,-ten,-twenty] [>:>])? [бешену<NUM>:бешену]
[кIе<NUM>:кIе̄] [>:>] [бешену<NUM>:бешену]

PATTERN Thousands
((Numeral[-one,-two] | Tens | Hundreds) [>:>])? [азару<NUM>:азару]
[кIе<NUM>:кIе̄] [>:>] [азару<NUM>:азару]

PATTERN Distributive
[<distr>:це̄] [>:>] Numeral[one] [>:>] (ClassMarker | Declension)
[кIе<NUM>:кIе̄] [>:>] Numeral[two] [>:>] [<card>:да] ([>:>] Declension)?
[<distr>:] :Numeral[-one,-two,-twenty] [>:>] Numeral[-one,-two,-twenty] [>:>] [<card>:да] ([>:>] Declension)?
[<distr>:] :Numeral[-one,-two,-ten,-twenty] [>:>] Numeral[-one,-two,-ten,-twenty] [>:>] [гьацIа<NUM>:цIали] ([>:>] Declension)?
[<distr>:кIа̄] [>:>] Numeral[twenty] [>:>] [<card>:да] ([>:>] Declension)?
(Numeral[-one,-ten,-twenty] [>:>])? [<distr>:беше] [>:>] [бешену<NUM>:бешену] [>:>] [<card>:да] ([>:>] Declension)?
((Numeral[-one] | Tens | Hundreds) [>:>])? [<distr>:аза] [>:>] [азару<NUM>:азару] [>:>] [<card>:да] ([>:>] Declension)?

PATTERN Multiplicative
(Numeral[-one,-two,-three,-four] | [кIе<NUM>:кIаᴴ] | [лъабу<NUM>:лъаб] | [буу<NUM>:буур])
Tens
(Numeral[-one,-ten,-twenty] [>:>])? [бешену<NUM>:бешен]
((Numeral[-one] | Tens | Hundreds) [>:>])? [азару<NUM>:азар]

PATTERN Declension
([<m>:щ] | [<f>:т] | [<n>:т]) [>:>] [<erg>:ти]
(OblMarker[hpl] | OblMarker[npl]) [>:>] CaseMarker[erg]
(OblMarker[m] | OblMarker[hpl]) ([<gen>:] | ([>:>] [<gen>:б]))
(OblMarker[f] | OblMarker[n] | OblMarker[npl]) [>:>] CaseMarker[gen]
OblMarker [>:>] (CaseMarker[-erg,-gen] | SpatialCase)

PATTERN SpatialCase
LocMarker ([<ess>:] | [<lat>:])
LocMarker[-cont] [>:>] DirMarker
LocMarker[cont] [>:>] DirMarker[-al,-trans]

LEXICON Numeral
це<NUM>:це[one]
кIе<NUM>:кIе[two]
лъабу<NUM>:лъабу[three]
буу<NUM>:буу[four]
инщтту<NUM>:инщтту
инлIи<NUM>:инлIи
гьакьу<NUM>:гьакьу
бикьи<NUM>:бикьи
гьачIи<NUM>:гьачIи
гьацIа<NUM>:гьацIа[ten]
кIе<NUM>>гьацIа<NUM>:кIа̄>цIа[twenty]

LEXICON ClassMarker
<m>:в
<f>:й
<n>:б
<h><pl>:бе
<n><pl>:ре

LEXICON OblMarker
<obl><m>:щу[m]
<obl><f>:лълъи[f]
<obl><n>:лълъи[n]
<obl><h><pl>:рду[hpl]
<obl><n><pl>:рди[npl]

LEXICON LocMarker
<sup>:ла
<cont>:чIу[cont]
<in>:о
<inter>:лIи
<apud>:ха
<ad>:хъи
<place>:алда

LEXICON DirMarker
<elat>:ру
<allat>:ху[al]
<translat>:руху[trans]
<translat>:риди[trans]
<translat>:руди[trans]
<translat>:рикьи[trans]

LEXICON CaseMarker
<erg>:ди[erg]
<gen>:лIи[gen]
<dat>:лъи
<aff>:ра
